tests/lin.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../lin.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../lin.automorf.hfst
Tests:
  Adjective:
    malámu<adj>: malámu
    molaí<adj><pl>: milaí
    monéne<adj><pl>: minéne
    monéne<adj><sg>: monéne
    ya<conn>: ya
  Adjectives:
    moké<adj><pl>: miké
    moké<adj><sg>: moké
    monéne<adj><pl>: minéne
    monéne<adj><sg>: monéne
  Adverb: {}
  Noun:
    moto<n><pl><cl2>: bato
    moto<n><sg><cl1>: moto
    moyíbi<n><pl><cl4>: miyíbi
    moyíbi<n><sg><cl3>: moyíbi
  Noun Classes and Plurals:
    bolingo<n><sg><cl14>: bolingo
    bondoki<n><sg><cl14>: bondoki
    ekolo<n><pl><cl8>: bikolo
    ekolo<n><sg><cl7>: ekolo
    kolinga<n><sg><cl15>: kolinga
    kotála<n><sg><cl15>: kotála
    likita<n><pl><cl6>: makita
    likita<n><sg><cl5>: likita
    lokásá<n><pl><cl6>: makásá
    lokásá<n><sg><cl11>: lokásá
    mbelí<n><pl><cl10>: mbelí
    mbelí<n><sg><cl9>: mbelí
    mokolo<n><pl><cl4>: mikolo
    mokolo<n><sg><cl3>: mokolo
    molakisi<n><pl><cl2>: balakisi
    molakisi<n><sg><cl1>: molakisi
    nzelá<n><pl><cl10>: nzelá
    nzelá<n><sg><cl9>: nzelá
  Noun Prefix Stacking:
    bozóba<n><sg><cl14><inst>: babozóba
    elóko<n><pl><cl8><def>: babilóko
    lokásá<n><pl><cl6><def>: bamakásá
    lokúmu<n><sg><cl11><inst>: balokúmu
    mokonzi<n><pl><cl1><abs><inst>: bakimokonzi
    mokonzi<n><sg><cl1><abs>: kimokonzi
    moyíbi<n><sg><cl1><abs>: kimoyíbi
  Parts of Speech: {}
  Preposition (and Conjunction):
    na<cngcoo>: na
    na<pr>: na
  Pronoun:
    ngáí<prn><pers><p1><sg><aa>: ngáí
    náni<prn><itg><sg><aa>: náni
    níni<prn><itg><sg><nn>: níni
    yangó<prn><pers><p3><pl><nn>: yangó
  Pronouns:
    bangó<prn><pers><p3><pl><aa>: bangó
    banáni<prn><itg><pl><aa>: banáni
    baóyo<prn><dem><pl>: baóyo
    bínó<prn><pers><p2><pl><aa>: bínó
    bísó<prn><pers><p1><pl><aa>: bísó
    ngáí<prn><pers><p1><sg><aa>: ngáí
    náni<prn><itg><sg><aa>: náni
    níni<prn><itg><pl><nn>: níni
    níni<prn><itg><sg><nn>: níni
    wâna<prn><dem><pl>: baóyo wâna
    wâna<prn><dem><sg>: óyo wâna
    yangó<prn><pers><p3><pl><nn>: yangó
    yangó<prn><pers><p3><sg><nn>: yangó
    yé<prn><pers><p3><sg><aa>: yé
    yó<prn><pers><p2><sg><aa>: yó
    óyo<prn><dem><sg>: óyo
  Verb:
    kokwéya<v><pres><p1><sg><aa>: nakwéyí
    kokwéya<v><pres><p3><pl><aa>: bakwéyí
    kokwéya<v><pres><p3><sg><aa>: akwéyí
    kokwéya<v><pres><p3><sp><nn>: ekwéyí
  Verb Compound Forms:
    kosála<v><inf>: kosála
    kotúna<v><inf>: kotúna
    kozala<vaux><fut><p1><pl><aa>: tokozala
    kozala<vaux><fut><p1><sg><aa>: nakozala
    kozala<vaux><past><p1><pl><aa>: tozaláká
    kozala<vaux><past><p1><sg><aa>: nazaláká
    kozala<vaux><pres><p1><pl><aa>: tozalí
    kozala<vaux><pres><p1><sg><aa>: nazalí
    kozala<vaux><urp><p1><pl><aa>: tozalákí
    kozala<vaux><urp><p1><sg><aa>: nazalákí
  Verb Future Tense and Reflexive:
    kosála<v><fut><p1><pl><aa>: tokosála
    kotúna<v><ref><fut><p1><sg><aa>: nakomítúna
    kotúna<v><ref><past><p2><sg><aa>: omítúnáká
    kotúna<v><ref><pres><p3><sg><aa>: amítúní
  Verb Mood:
    kokenda<v><imp>: kendá
    kosála<v><imp>: sálá
    kosála<v><prs><p1><pl><aa>: tósalí
    kosála<v><prs><p1><sg><aa>: násalí
    kosála<v><prs><p2><pl><aa>: bósalí
    kosála<v><prs><p2><sg><aa>: ósalí
    kosála<v><prs><p3><pl><aa>: básalí
    kosála<v><prs><p3><sg><aa>: ésalí
    koyâ<v><imp>: yáká
    kozala<v><inf>: kozala
  Verb Past Tense:
    kosála<v><dpres><p1><pl><aa>: tosálá
    kosála<v><dpres><p1><sg><aa>: nasálá
    kosála<v><dpres><p2><pl><aa>: bosálá
    kosála<v><dpres><p2><sg><aa>: osálá
    kosála<v><dpres><p3><pl><aa>: basálá
    kosála<v><dpres><p3><sg><aa>: asálá
    kosála<v><past><p1><pl><aa>: tosáláká
    kosála<v><past><p1><sg><aa>: nasáláká
    kosála<v><past><p2><pl><aa>: bosáláká
    kosála<v><past><p2><sg><aa>: osáláká
    kosála<v><past><p3><pl><aa>: basáláká
    kosála<v><past><p3><sg><aa>: asáláká
    kosála<v><urp><p1><pl><aa>: tosálákí
    kosála<v><urp><p1><sg><aa>: nasálákí
    kosála<v><urp><p2><pl><aa>: bosálákí
    kosála<v><urp><p2><sg><aa>: osálákí
    kosála<v><urp><p3><pl><aa>: basálákí
    kosála<v><urp><p3><sg><aa>: asálákí
  Verb Present Tense:
    kokámwa<v><pres><p1><sg><aa>: nakámwé
    kokámwa<v><pres><p3><pl><aa>: bakámwé
    kolinga<v><pres><p1><pl><aa>: tolingí
    kolinga<v><pres><p1><sg><aa>: nalingí
    kolinga<v><pres><p2><pl><aa>: bolingí
    kolinga<v><pres><p2><sg><aa>: olingí
    kolinga<v><pres><p3><pl><aa>: balingí
    kolinga<v><pres><p3><sg><aa>: alingí
    kolinga<v><pres><p3><sp><nn>: elingí
  Verb Radical Extensions:
    kobánga<v><caus><pres><p1><pl><aa>: tobángisí
    kobóta<v><pass><pres><p1><sg><aa>: nabótamí
    kokunda<v><pass><pres><p3><sp><nn>: ekundamí
    kolinga<v><recip><pres><p3><pl><aa>: balinganí
    koloba<v><appl><pres><p1><sg><aa>: nalobelí
    konyánga<v><caus><rev><pres><p3><sp><nn>: enyángolí
    konyánga<v><rev><pres><p3><sp><nn>: enyángwé
    kopona<v><appl><pres><p3><sg><aa>: aponelí
    kotíka<v><stat><pres><p1><sg><aa>: natíkalí
    koyéba<v><caus><pres><p3><sg><aa>: ayébisí
    koyéba<v><recip><pres><p3><pl><aa>: bayébaní
  spellrelax:
    bómoí<n><sg><cl14>: bɔmɔi
    etebu<n><sg><cl7>: ɛtɛbu
    lokúmu<n><sg><cl11><inst>: balokumu
    mokolo<n><sg><cl3>: mɔkɔlɔ
    nzelá<n><sg><cl9>: nzela
    óyo<prn><dem><sg>: oyo
